Hawaii statutes.
CONSTRUCTION
OF CHAPTER

§806-1 Definitions. In this chapter: "act"
or "doing of an act" includes "omission to act"; "the
court" unless a contrary intention appears means the court before which
the trial is had; "the offense" means the specific offense
constituted by the acts or omissions of the accused as distinguished from "the
transaction" which means the particular acts, facts, and circumstances
which distinguish the offense committed from other offenses of the same nature.
[L 1915, c 215, pt of §2; RL 1925, §4021; RL 1935, §5494; RL 1945, §10795; RL
1955, §258-1; HRS §711-1; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next